tortoisesvn/ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	w5	Y	39
SFX	w5	أ	ئي/JbX0	أ
SFX	w5	ئ	ئي/JbX0	ئ
SFX	w5	اء	وئي/JbX0	اء
SFX	w5	ءى	ئي/JbX0	ءى
SFX	w5	أى	ئي/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w5	أى	ئي/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w5	آ	ئي/JbX0	آ
SFX	w5	ا	ي/JbX0	ا
SFX	w5	و	ي/JbX0	و
SFX	w5	ى	ي/JbX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w5	ي	ي/JbX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w5	ئي	أي/JbX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w5	0	ي/JbX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w5	أ	آ/JbX0	أ
SFX	w5	ئ	آ/JbX0	ئ
SFX	w5	اء	وءا/JbX0	اء
SFX	w5	ءى	ئيا/JbX0	ءى
SFX	w5	أى	ئيا/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w5	أى	ئيا/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w5	آ	ؤوا/JbX0	آ
SFX	w5	ا	وا/JbX0	ا
SFX	w5	و	وا/JbX0	و
SFX	w5	ى	يا/JbX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w5	ي	يا/JbX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w5	ئي	أيا/JbX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w5	0	ا/JbX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w5	أ	ؤوا/JbX0	أ
SFX	w5	ئ	ؤوا/JbX0	ئ
SFX	w5	اء	وؤوا/JbX0	اء
SFX	w5	ءى	ؤوا/JbX0	ءى
SFX	w5	أى	ؤوا/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w5	أى	ؤوا/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w5	آ	ؤوا/JbX0	آ
SFX	w5	ا	وا/JbX0	ا
SFX	w5	و	وا/JbX0	و
SFX	w5	ى	وا/JbX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w5	ي	وا/JbX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w5	ئي	أوا/JbX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w5	0	وا/JbX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	w6	Y	14
SFX	w6	ن	ن/JbX0	ن
SFX	w6	أ	أن/JbX0	أ
SFX	w6	ئ	أن/JbX0	ئ
SFX	w6	اء	ؤن/JbX0	اء
SFX	w6	ءى	ئين/JbX0	ءى
SFX	w6	أى	ئين/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w6	أى	ئين/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w6	آ	ؤون/JbX0	آ
SFX	w6	ا	ون/JbX0	ا
SFX	w6	و	ون/JbX0	و
SFX	w6	ى	ين/JbX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w6	ي	ين/JbX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w6	ئي	أين/JbX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w6	0	ن/JbX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،الصنف-الثالث
#أنتَ
SFX	w7	Y	13
SFX	w7	0	0/JcX0	أ
SFX	w7	ئ	أ/JcX0	ئ
SFX	w7	اء	ؤ/JcX0	اء
SFX	w7	ءى	ء/JcX0	ءى
SFX	w7	أى	أ/JcX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w7	أى	ء/JcX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w7	آ	ء/JcX0	آ
SFX	w7	ا	0/JcX0	ا
SFX	w7	و	0/JcX0	و
SFX	w7	ى	0/JcX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w7	ي	0/JcX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w7	ئي	ء/JcX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w7	0	0/JcX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	w8	Y	39
SFX	w8	أ	ئي/JcX0	أ
SFX	w8	ئ	ئي/JcX0	ئ
SFX	w8	اء	وئي/JcX0	اء
SFX	w8	ءى	ئي/JcX0	ءى
SFX	w8	أى	ئي/JcX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w8	أى	ئي/JcX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w8	آ	ئي/JcX0	آ
SFX	w8	ا	ي/JcX0	ا
SFX	w8	و	ي/JcX0	و
SFX	w8	ى	ي/JcX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w8	ي	ي/JcX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w8	ئي	أي/JcX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w8	0	ي/JcX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w8	أ	آ/JcX0	أ
SFX	w8	ئ	آ/JcX0	ئ
SFX	w8	اء	وءا/JcX0	اء
SFX	w8	ءى	ئيا/JcX0	ءى
SFX	w8	أى	ئيا/JcX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w8	أى	ئيا/JcX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w8	آ	ؤوا/JcX0	آ
SFX	w8	ا	وا/JcX0	ا
SFX	w8	و	وا/JcX0	و
SFX	w8	ى	يا/JcX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w8	ي	يا/JcX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w8	ئي	أيا/JcX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w8	0	ا/JcX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w8	أ	ؤوا/JcX0	أ
SFX	w8	ئ	ؤوا/JcX0	ئ
SFX	w8	اء	وؤوا/JcX0	اء
SFX	w8	ءى	ؤوا/JcX0	ءى
SFX	w8	أى	ؤوا/JcX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w8	أى	ؤوا/JcX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w8	آ	ؤوا/JcX0	آ
SFX	w8	ا	وا/JcX0	ا
SFX	w8	و	وا/JcX0	و
SFX	w8	ى	وا/JcX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w8	ي	وا/JcX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w8	ئي	أوا/JcX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w8	0	وا/JcX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	w9	Y	14
SFX	w9	ن	ن/JcX0	ن
SFX	w9	أ	أن/JcX0	أ
SFX	w9	ئ	أن/JcX0	ئ
SFX	w9	اء	ؤن/JcX0	اء
SFX	w9	ءى	ئين/JcX0	ءى
SFX	w9	أى	ئين/JcX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w9	أى	ئين/JcX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w9	آ	ؤون/JcX0	آ
SFX	w9	ا	ون/JcX0	ا
SFX	w9	و	ون/JcX0	و
SFX	w9	ى	ين/JcX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w9	ي	ين/JcX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w9	ئي	أين/JcX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w9	0	ن/JcX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،الصنف-الرابع
#أنتَ
SFX	w$	Y	13
SFX	w$	0	0/JdX0	أ
SFX	w$	ئ	أ/JdX0	ئ
SFX	w$	اء	ؤ/JdX0	اء
SFX	w$	ءى	ء/JdX0	ءى
SFX	w$	أى	أ/JdX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w$	أى	ء/JdX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w$	آ	ء/JdX0	آ
SFX	w$	ا	0/JdX0	ا
SFX	w$	و	0/JdX0	و
SFX	w$	ى	0/JdX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w$	ي	0/JdX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w$	ئي	ء/JdX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w$	0	0/JdX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	w@	Y	39
SFX	w@	أ	ئي/JdX0	أ
SFX	w@	ئ	ئي/JdX0	ئ
SFX	w@	اء	وئي/JdX0	اء
SFX	w@	ءى	ئي/JdX0	ءى
SFX	w@	أى	ئي/JdX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w@	أى	ئي/JdX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w@	آ	ئي/JdX0	آ
SFX	w@	ا	ي/JdX0	ا
SFX	w@	و	ي/JdX0	و
SFX	w@	ى	ي/JdX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w@	ي	ي/JdX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w@	ئي	أي/JdX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w@	0	ي/JdX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w@	أ	آ/JdX0	أ
SFX	w@	ئ	آ/JdX0	ئ
SFX	w@	اء	وءا/JdX0	اء
SFX	w@	ءى	ئيا/JdX0	ءى
SFX	w@	أى	ئيا/JdX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w@	أى	ئيا/JdX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w@	آ	ؤوا/JdX0	آ
SFX	w@	ا	وا/JdX0	ا
SFX	w@	و	وا/JdX0	و
SFX	w@	ى	يا/JdX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w@	ي	يا/JdX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w@	ئي	أيا/JdX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w@	0	ا/JdX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w@	أ	ؤوا/JdX0	أ
SFX	w@	ئ	ؤوا/JdX0	ئ
SFX	w@	اء	وؤوا/JdX0	اء
SFX	w@	ءى	ؤوا/JdX0	ءى
SFX	w@	أى	ؤوا/JdX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w@	أى	ؤوا/JdX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w@	آ	ؤوا/JdX0	آ
SFX	w@	ا	وا/JdX0	ا
SFX	w@	و	وا/JdX0	و
SFX	w@	ى	وا/JdX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w@	ي	وا/JdX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w@	ئي	أوا/JdX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w@	0	وا/JdX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	w&	Y	14
SFX	w&	ن	ن/JdX0	ن
SFX	w&	أ	أن/JdX0	أ
SFX	w&	ئ	أن/JdX0	ئ
SFX	w&	اء	ؤن/JdX0	اء
SFX	w&	ءى	ئين/JdX0	ءى
SFX	w&	أى	ئين/JdX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w&	أى	ئين/JdX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w&	آ	ؤون/JdX0	آ
SFX	w&	ا	ون/JdX0	ا
SFX	w&	و	ون/JdX0	و
SFX	w&	ى	ين/JdX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w&	ي	ين/JdX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w&	ئي	أين/JdX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w&	0	ن/JdX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،الصنف-الخامس
#أنتَ
SFX	w(	Y	13
SFX	w(	0	0/JeX0	أ
SFX	w(	ئ	أ/JeX0	ئ
SFX	w(	اء	ؤ/JeX0	اء
SFX	w(	ءى	ء/JeX0	ءى
SFX	w(	أى	أ/JeX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w(	أى	ء/JeX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w(	آ	ء/JeX0	آ
SFX	w(	ا	0/JeX0	ا
SFX	w(	و	0/JeX0	و
SFX	w(	ى	0/JeX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w(	ي	0/JeX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w(	ئي	ء/JeX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w(	0	0/JeX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	w)	Y	39
SFX	w)	أ	ئي/JeX0	أ
SFX	w)	ئ	ئي/JeX0	ئ
SFX	w)	اء	وئي/JeX0	اء
SFX	w)	ءى	ئي/JeX0	ءى
SFX	w)	أى	ئي/JeX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w)	أى	ئي/JeX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w)	آ	ئي/JeX0	آ
SFX	w)	ا	ي/JeX0	ا
SFX	w)	و	ي/JeX0	و
SFX	w)	ى	ي/JeX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w)	ي	ي/JeX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w)	ئي	أي/JeX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w)	0	ي/JeX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w)	أ	آ/JeX0	أ
SFX	w)	ئ	آ/JeX0	ئ
SFX	w)	اء	وءا/JeX0	اء
SFX	w)	ءى	ئيا/JeX0	ءى
SFX	w)	أى	ئيا/JeX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w)	أى	ئيا/JeX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w)	آ	ؤوا/JeX0	آ
SFX	w)	ا	وا/JeX0	ا
SFX	w)	و	وا/JeX0	و
SFX	w)	ى	يا/JeX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w)	ي	يا/JeX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w)	ئي	أيا/JeX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w)	0	ا/JeX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	w)	أ	ؤوا/JeX0	أ
SFX	w)	ئ	ؤوا/JeX0	ئ
SFX	w)	اء	وؤوا/JeX0	اء
SFX	w)	ءى	ؤوا/JeX0	ءى
SFX	w)	أى	ؤوا/JeX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w)	أى	ؤوا/JeX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w)	آ	ؤوا/JeX0	آ
SFX	w)	ا	وا/JeX0	ا
SFX	w)	و	وا/JeX0	و
SFX	w)	ى	وا/JeX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w)	ي	وا/JeX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w)	ئي	أوا/JeX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w)	0	وا/JeX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	w{	Y	14
SFX	w{	ن	ن/JeX0	ن
SFX	w{	أ	أن/JeX0	أ
SFX	w{	ئ	أن/JeX0	ئ
SFX	w{	اء	ؤن/JeX0	اء
SFX	w{	ءى	ئين/JeX0	ءى
SFX	w{	أى	ئين/JeX0	[ت]أى
SFX	w{	أى	ئين/JeX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	w{	آ	ؤون/JeX0	آ
SFX	w{	ا	ون/JeX0	ا
SFX	w{	و	ون/JeX0	و
SFX	w{	ى	ين/JeX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	w{	ي	ين/JeX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	w{	ئي	أين/JeX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	w{	0	ن/JeX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الثانية،الصنف-الأول
#أنتَ
SFX	x1	Y	7
SFX	x1	أ	ؤ/JaX0	أ
SFX	x1	اء	أ/JaX0	اء
SFX	x1	ي	0/JaX0	ي
SFX	x1	ءى	ء/JaX0	ءى
SFX	x1	أى	أ/JaX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x1	أى	ء/JaX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x1	0	0/JaX0	[^أءيى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	x2	Y	21
SFX	x2	أ	ئي/JaX0	أ
SFX	x2	اء	ائي/JaX0	اء
SFX	x2	ي	ي/JaX0	ي
SFX	x2	ءى	ءي/JaX0	ءى
SFX	x2	أى	أي/JaX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x2	أى	أي/JaX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x2	0	ي/JaX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	x2	أ	ؤا/JaX0	أ
SFX	x2	اء	اءا/JaX0	اء
SFX	x2	ي	يا/JaX0	ي
SFX	x2	ءى	ءيا/JaX0	ءى
SFX	x2	أى	أيا/JaX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x2	أى	أيا/JaX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x2	0	ا/JaX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	x2	أ	ؤوا/JaX0	أ
SFX	x2	اء	اؤوا/JaX0	اء
SFX	x2	ي	وا/JaX0	ي
SFX	x2	ءى	ءوا/JaX0	ءى
SFX	x2	أى	أوا/JaX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x2	أى	أوا/JaX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x2	0	وا/JaX0	[^أءيى]
#أنتن
SFX	x3	Y	7
SFX	x3	أ	ؤن/JaX0	أ
SFX	x3	اء	أن/JaX0	اء
SFX	x3	ي	ين/JaX0	ي
SFX	x3	ءى	ءين/JaX0	ءى
SFX	x3	أى	أين/JaX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x3	أى	أين/JaX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x3	0	ن/JaX0	[^أءيى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الثانية،الصنف-الثاني
#أنتَ
SFX	x4	Y	7
SFX	x4	أ	ؤ/JbX0	أ
SFX	x4	اء	أ/JbX0	اء
SFX	x4	ي	0/JbX0	ي
SFX	x4	ءى	ء/JbX0	ءى
SFX	x4	أى	أ/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x4	أى	ء/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x4	0	0/JbX0	[^أءيى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	x5	Y	21
SFX	x5	أ	ئي/JbX0	أ
SFX	x5	اء	ائي/JbX0	اء
SFX	x5	ي	ي/JbX0	ي
SFX	x5	ءى	ءي/JbX0	ءى
SFX	x5	أى	أي/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x5	أى	أي/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x5	0	ي/JbX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	x5	أ	ؤا/JbX0	أ
SFX	x5	اء	اءا/JbX0	اء
SFX	x5	ي	يا/JbX0	ي
SFX	x5	ءى	ءيا/JbX0	ءى
SFX	x5	أى	أيا/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x5	أى	أيا/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x5	0	ا/JbX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	x5	أ	ؤوا/JbX0	أ
SFX	x5	اء	اؤوا/JbX0	اء
SFX	x5	ي	وا/JbX0	ي
SFX	x5	ءى	ءوا/JbX0	ءى
SFX	x5	أى	أوا/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x5	أى	أوا/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x5	0	وا/JbX0	[^أءيى]
#أنتن
SFX	x6	Y	7
SFX	x6	أ	ؤن/JbX0	أ
SFX	x6	اء	أن/JbX0	اء
SFX	x6	ي	ين/JbX0	ي
SFX	x6	ءى	ءين/JbX0	ءى
SFX	x6	أى	أين/JbX0	[ت]أى
SFX	x6	أى	أين/JbX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	x6	0	ن/JbX0	[^أءيى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الثالثة،الصنف-الأول
#أنتَ
SFX	y1	Y	7
SFX	y1	أ	ئ/JaX0	أ
SFX	y1	اء	ئ/JaX0	اء
SFX	y1	0	0/JaX0	ي
SFX	y1	0	0/JbX0	ي
SFX	y1	أى	إ/JeX0	أى
SFX	y1	أى	0/JaX0	أى
SFX	y1	0	0/JaX0	[^أيءى]
